Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF33.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 1062HH (1) 91 jda/jh H.F. 33 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 256.20 Agriculture education grant 1 program. 2 1. As used in this section: 3 a. âAgriculture education programâ means all of the 4 following: 5 (1) Instructional programs provided by school districts 6 to students enrolled in grades nine through twelve under 7 section 256.11, subsection 5, paragraph âhâ , subparagraph (1), 8 subparagraph division (a). 9 (2) Programs for career and technical education in 10 agriculture technology provided by school districts to students 11 under section 280.20. 12 b. âPersonal services costsâ means the costs associated 13 with a school district employing a teacher for a maximum of 14 sixty days of additional instruction outside of the teacherâs 15 regularly scheduled teaching duties to provide instruction in 16 an agriculture education program. 17 2. The department shall establish an agriculture education 18 grant program to expand student access to instruction related 19 to agriculture, food, and natural resources. 20 3. A school district may apply to the department for grants 21 under this section to offset the personal services costs 22 associated with employing teachers to provide instruction in an 23 agriculture education program. The maximum annual amount of a 24 grant the department may award to a school district under this 25 section shall not exceed: 26 a. One hundred percent of the personal services costs 27 associated with a teacher providing instruction in an 28 agriculture education program if the school districtâs 29 agriculture education program has existed for less than ten 30 consecutive years. 31 b. Fifty percent of the personal services cost associated 32 with a teacher providing instruction in an agriculture 33 education program for all other programs. 34 4. Moneys awarded under this section shall be used to 35 -1- LSB 1062HH (1) 91 jda/jh 1/ 3 H.F. 33 supplement, not supplant, existing public funding used by a 1 school district for similar purposes. 2 5. The department shall develop and make available to 3 school districts a statewide system to track the time teachers 4 devote to instruction facilitated by grants provided under this 5 section. 6 6. An agriculture education grant program fund is 7 established in the state treasury. The fund shall be 8 administered by the department and shall consist of moneys 9 appropriated by the general assembly and any other moneys 10 received by the department for deposit in the fund. The 11 moneys in the fund are appropriated to the department for the 12 agriculture education grant program. Notwithstanding section 13 8.33, moneys in the fund at the close of the fiscal year shall 14 not revert to the general fund of the state but shall remain 15 available for expenditure for the agriculture education grant 16 program for subsequent fiscal years. Notwithstanding section 17 12C.7, subsection 2, interest or earnings on moneys in the fund 18 shall be credited to the fund. 19 7. The state board shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A 20 to administer this section, including rules related to grant 21 application materials, eligibility requirements, and award 22 criteria. 23